Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1510
Support; supplemental to other programs; availability of other programs; department; duties.

The support available under sections 68-1501 to 68-1519 shall be supplemental to other support programs for which the family or disabled person is eligible and is not intended to reduce the responsibility for the provision of services and support by such other programs. The department shall (1) determine whether any request under sections 68-1501 to 68-1519 is appropriate to and available from other support programs, (2) deny any request if the requested assistance is appropriate to and available from other support programs, and (3) provide information and referral to all families and disabled persons whose request for assistance was denied pursuant to this section on the procedure for applying for other appropriate and available support programs.

Laws 1981, LB 389, § 10.